Connecticut, session 2026, SB00163.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate ten
million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department
of Transportation for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the
town of Columbia for improvements to Doubleday Road, including, but
not limited to, drainage, the bridge and roadbed.